Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,106
Department; gifts, devises, and bequests; accept; loans; terms and conditions.

The State Department of Education may accept, in trust, any gifts, devises, and bequests to be held and administered by the department for the purpose of making loans to worthy and needy students attending any college, university, or community college in this state. Such loans shall only be made to students whose parents are residents of Nebraska. Such loans shall be made on such terms and conditions as the State Board of Education shall prescribe or as may be imposed by the donor.

Laws 1967, c. 522, § 1, p. 1743;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-321.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 110.

State Board of Education, duties with respect to devises, donations, or bequests, see section 79-318.